Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund created pursuant to
Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes the sum of Five
Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to provide funding for a municipal park located in a
county with a population greater than seven hundred fifty thousand
(750,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census and north
of I-344 and west of I-35.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund created pursuant to

Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes the sum of Four
Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to relocate a naval submarine located east of State
Highway 165 and north of State Highway 62.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund created pursuant to
Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes the sum of One
Million Eight Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,800,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to implement infrastructure improvements
at an industrial park located south of State Highway 62 and east of
State Highway 283.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2794 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2794 Page 3